Nebraska, session 109, LB310.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB310 LB310
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 71-519, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-519 (1) All infants born in the State of Nebraska shall be
screened for phenylketonuria, congenital primary hypothyroidism,
biotinidase deficiency, galactosemia, hemoglobinopathies, medium-chain
acyl co-a dehydrogenase (MCAD) deficiency, X-linked adrenoleukodystrophy
(X-ALD), mucopolysaccharidoses type 1 (MPS-1), Pompe disease, spinal
muscular atrophy, and such other inherited or congenital infant or
childhood-onset diseases as the Department of Health and Human Services
may from time to time specify. Confirmatory tests shall be performed if a
presumptive positive result on the screening test is obtained.
(2) The attending physician shall collect or cause to be collected
the prescribed blood specimen or specimens and shall submit or cause to
be submitted the same to the laboratory designated by the department for
the performance of such tests within the period and in the manner
prescribed by the department. If a birth is not attended by a physician
and the infant does not have a physician, the person registering the
birth shall cause such tests to be performed within the period and in the
manner prescribed by the department. The laboratory shall within the
period and in the manner prescribed by the department perform such tests
as are prescribed by the department on the specimen or specimens
submitted and report the results of these tests to the physician, if any,
the hospital or other birthing facility or other submitter, and the
department. The laboratory shall report to the department the results of
such tests that are presumptive positive or confirmed positive within the
period and in the manner prescribed by the department.
(3) The hospital or other birthing facility shall record the
collection of specimens for tests for metabolic diseases and the report
of the results of such tests or the absence of such report. For purposes
of tracking, monitoring, and referral, the hospital or other birthing
facility shall provide from its records, upon the department's request,
-2-

LB310 LB310
2025 2025
information about the infant's and mother's location and contact
information, and care and treatment of the infant.
(4)(a) The department shall have authority over the use, retention,
and disposal of blood specimens and all related information collected in
connection with disease testing conducted under subsection (1) of this
section.
(b) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
relating to the retention and disposal of such specimens. The rules and
regulations shall: (i) Be consistent with nationally recognized standards
for laboratory accreditation and shall comply with all applicable
provisions of federal law; (ii) require that the disposal be conducted in
the presence of a witness who may be an individual involved in the
disposal or any other individual; and (iii) provide for maintenance of a
written or electronic record of the disposal, verified by such witness.
(c) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
relating to the use of such specimens and related information. Such use
shall only be made for public health purposes and shall comply with all
applicable provisions of federal law. The department may charge a
reasonable fee for evaluating proposals relating to the use of such
specimens for public health research and for preparing and supplying
specimens for research proposals approved by the department.
(5) The department shall prepare written materials explaining the
requirements of this section. The department shall include the following
information in the pamphlet:
(a) The nature and purpose of the testing program required under
this section, including, but not limited to, a brief description of each
condition or disorder listed in subsection (1) of this section;
(b) The purpose and value of the infant's parent, guardian, or
person in loco parentis retaining a blood specimen obtained under
subsection (6) of this section in a safe place;
(c) The department's procedures for retaining and disposing of blood
-3-

LB310 LB310
2025 2025
specimens developed under subsection (4) of this section; and
(d) That the blood specimens taken for purposes of conducting the
tests required under subsection (1) of this section may be used for
research pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.
(6) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section, the attending physician or person registering the birth may
offer to draw an additional blood specimen from the infant. If such an
offer is made, it shall be made to the infant's parent, guardian, or
person in loco parentis at the time the blood specimens are drawn for
purposes of subsection (1) of this section. If the infant's parent,
guardian, or person in loco parentis accepts the offer of an additional
blood specimen, the blood specimen shall be preserved in a manner that
does not require special storage conditions or techniques. The attending
physician or person making the offer shall explain to the parent,
guardian, or person in loco parentis at the time the offer is made that
the additional blood specimen can be used for future identification
purposes and should be kept in a safe place. The attending physician or
person making the offer may charge a fee that is not more than the actual
cost of obtaining and preserving the additional blood specimen.
(7) The person responsible for causing the tests to be performed
under subsection (2) of this section shall inform the parent or legal
guardian of the infant of the tests and of the results of the tests and
provide, upon any request for further information, at least a copy of the
written materials prepared under subsection (5) of this section.
(8) Dietary and therapeutic management of the infant with
phenylketonuria, primary hypothyroidism, biotinidase deficiency,
galactosemia, hemoglobinopathies, MCAD deficiency, X-linked
adrenoleukodystrophy (X-ALD), mucopolysaccharidoses type 1 (MPS-1), Pompe
disease, spinal muscular atrophy, or such other inherited or congenital
infant or childhood-onset diseases as the department may from time to
time specify shall be the responsibility of the child's parent, guardian,
-4-

LB310 LB310
2025 2025
or custodian with the aid of a physician selected by such person.
(9) Except for acts of gross negligence or willful or wanton
conduct, any physician, hospital or other birthing facility, laboratory,
or other submitter making reports or notifications under sections 71-519
to 71-524 shall be immune from criminal or civil liability of any kind or
character based on any statements contained in such reports or
notifications.
(10) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an infant
to submit to screening as provided in subsection (1) of this section if
the parent or guardian of such infant objects to such screening.
Sec. 2. Original section 71-519, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-5-